incubator/apertium-en-lv.lv.dix
    <pardef n="emphprn__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pats</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>paša</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašam</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašā</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>paši</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašiem</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašus</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pati</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašai</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašā</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašām</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pašās</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kas__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kas</l>
          <r>kas<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kā</l>
          <r>kas<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kam</l>
          <r>kas<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ko</l>
          <r>kas<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="/būt__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>būt</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Pres -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esmu</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esi</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esam</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esat</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Past -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>biju</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>biji</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bija</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bijām</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bijāt</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Future -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>būšu</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>būsi</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>būs</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>būsim</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>būsit</l>
          <r>būt<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e><par n="emphprn__prn"/></e>
    <e><par n="kas__det"/></e>
    <e><par n="/būt__vbser"/></e>
